Massachusetts, session 194th, H3617.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
This legislation seeks to amend G.L. Chapter 90B: Section 26, Prohibited or limited
operation by underage persons; restrictions by creating a new § (i) . The legislation states that
ALL persons who operate such recreational utility vehicles shall be required to participate in a
regulated mandatory training program before operating such vehicle.
of 1